Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1330.01
State Employees Retirement Fund; elected officials and employees having a regular term; sections, when operative.

The provisions of sections 84-1309, 84-1317, and 84-1330.01 pertaining to elected officials or other employees having a regular term of office shall be so interpreted as to effectuate their general purpose and to take effect as soon as the same may become operative under the Constitution of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1967, c. 619, § 3, p. 2075.